Hawaii statutes.
§206M-2 Establishment of the high
technology development corporation; purpose. (a) There is established the
high technology development corporation, which shall be a public body corporate
and politic and an instrumentality and agency of the State. The development
corporation shall be placed within the department of business, economic
development, and tourism for administrative purposes, pursuant to section
26-35. The purpose of the development corporation shall be to facilitate the
growth and development of the commercial high technology industry in Hawaii.
Its duties shall include, but not be limited to:

(1) Developing and encouraging industrial parks as
high technology innovation centers and developing or assisting with the
development of projects within or outside of industrial parks, including
participating with the private sector in such development;

(2) Providing financial and other support and
services to Hawaii-based high technology companies;

(3) Collecting and analyzing information on the state
of commercial high technology activity in Hawaii;

(4) Promoting and marketing Hawaii as a site for
commercial high technology activity; and

(5) Providing advice on policy and planning for
technology-based economic development.

(b) The governing body of the development
corporation shall consist of a board of directors having eleven voting
members. Seven of the members shall be appointed by the governor for staggered
terms pursuant to section 26-34. Six of the appointed members shall be from
the general public and selected on the basis of their knowledge, interest, and
proven expertise in, but not limited to, one or more of the following fields:
finance, commerce and trade, corporate management, marketing, economics,
engineering, and telecommunications, and other high technology fields. The
other appointed member shall be selected from the faculty of the University of
Hawaii. All appointed members of the board shall continue in office until
their respective successors have been appointed. The director of business,
economic development, and tourism, the director of finance, an appointed member
from the board of the Hawaii strategic development corporation, and an
appointed member from the board of the natural energy laboratory of Hawaii
authority, or their designated representatives, shall serve as ex officio
voting members of the board. The director of business, economic development,
and tourism shall serve as the chairperson until such time as a chairperson is
elected by the board from the membership. The board shall elect such other
officers as it deems necessary.

(c) The members of the board appointed under
subsection (b) shall serve without compensation, but may be reimbursed for
expenses, including travel expenses, incurred in the performance of their
duties.

(d) The board shall appoint a chief executive
officer, who shall serve at the pleasure of the board and shall be exempt from
chapter 76. The board shall set the salary and duties of the executive
officer.

(e) The board shall appoint a management
advisory committee for each industrial park and related project or projects
governed by the board. Each committee shall have five members, who shall serve
without compensation but may be reimbursed for expenses incurred in the
performance of their duties. The members shall be drawn from fields of
activity related to each industrial park and related project or projects. [L
1983, c 152, pt of §2; am L 1987, c 336, §7; am L 1989, c 274, §2; am L 1990, c
293, §8; am L 1991, c 288, §1; am L 2000, c 72, §§5, 6, c 253, §150, and c 297,
§25]

Attorney General Opinions

Cited, as a constitutional board and commission statute where
members may serve as holdovers until their successors are
"appointed", without any reference to the successors being fully
"qualified"; an "appointment" properly occurs under the
interim appointments provision of article V, §6 of the state constitution.
Att. Gen. Op. 16-3.

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next